Utah statutes.
78B-3-208.   Default judgments.

(1)  A default judgement may not be entered until the expiration of at least 30 days after service.

(2)  A default judgment entered on service may be set aside only on a showing which would be timely and sufficient to set aside a default judgment entered on personal service within this state.



Renumbered and Amended by Chapter 3, 2008 General Session

